Massachusetts, session 194th, S2570.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14 of chapter 92A½ of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 14, the words “Massachusetts
Wildlife Federation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “Environmental League
of Massachusetts, a representative of the Massachusetts Rivers Association”.
SECTION 2. Said section 14 of said chapter 92A½ , as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 16 and 17, the words “and a representative of the Upper Ware
river watershed association” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “a
representative of a local Snowmobile Association of Massachusetts snowmobile club, a
representative of a local equestrian group, a representative of a local environmental protection or
conservation group, a representative of the New England Mountain Bike Association”.
of 1